Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Plates; design, visibility, periods of issuance. (a) The commissioner, upon approval and payment, must issue to the applicant the plates required by this chapter, bearing the state name and an assigned vehicle registration number. The number assigned by the commissioner may be a combination of a letter or sign with figures. The color of the plates and the color of the abbreviation of the state name and the number assigned must be in marked contrast. The plates must be lettered, spaced, or distinguished to suitably indicate the registration of the vehicle according to the rules of the commissioner. (b) When a vehicle is registered on the basis of total gross weight, the plates issued must clearly indicate by letters or other suitable insignia the maximum gross weight for which the tax has been paid. (c) Plates issued to a noncommercial vehicle must bear the inscription "noncommercial" unless the vehicle is displaying a special plate authorized and issued under this chapter. (d) A one-ton pickup truck that is used for commercial purposes and is subject to section 168.185, is eligible to display special plates as authorized and issued under this chapter. (e) The plates must be so treated as to be at least 100 times brighter than the conventional painted number plates. When properly mounted on an unlighted vehicle, the plates, when viewed from a vehicle equipped with standard headlights, must be visible for a distance of not less than 1,500 feet and readable for a distance of not less than 110 feet. (f) new text begin Except as provided in section 168.1205, new text end the commissioner must issue plates for the following periods: (1) new plates issued pursuant to section 168.012, subdivision 1, must be issued to a vehicle for as long as the vehicle is owned by the exempt agency and the plate is not transferable from one vehicle to another but the plate may be transferred with the vehicle from one tax-exempt agency to anotherdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) plates issued for passenger automobiles must be issued for a seven-year period. All plates issued under this paragraph must be replaced if they are seven years old or older at the time of registration renewal or will become so during the registration perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) plates issued under sections 168.053 and 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17, must be for a seven-year perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (4) plates issued under subdivisions 2c and 2d and sections 168.123, 168.1235, and 168.1255 must be issued for the life of the veteran under section 169.79deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end (5) plates for any vehicle not specified in clauses (1) to (3) must be issued for the life of the vehicle. (g) In a year in which plates are not issued, the commissioner must issue for each registration a sticker to designate the year of registration. This sticker must show the year or years for which the sticker is issued, and is valid only for that period. The plates and stickers issued for a vehicle may not be transferred to another vehicle during the period for which the sticker is issued, except when issued for a vehicle registered under section 168.187. (h) Despite any other provision of this subdivision, plates issued to a vehicle used for behind-the-wheel instruction in a driver education course in a public school may be transferred to another vehicle used for the same purpose without payment of any additional fee. The public school must notify the commissioner of each transfer of plates under this paragraph. The commissioner may prescribe a format for notification. (i) In lieu of plates required under this section, the commissioner must issue a registration number identical to the federally issued tail number assigned to a roadable aircraft. Sec. 2. new text begin [168.1205] LIFETIME LICENSE PLATE RETENTION AND TRANSFER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Established; ineligible plates. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in this section, the commissioner must allow an applicant for license plates to retain and transfer the issued license plates for the duration of the applicant's lifetime so long as the vehicle's yearly registration remains valid and is not otherwise subject to suspension, cancellation, or impoundment. The commissioner must make the option for the issuance of lifetime license plates available upon: new text end new text begin (1) the purchase of a new motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) the issuance of new license plates under this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) the renewal of a vehicle's registration under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) the issuance of replacement license plates under section 168.29; or new text end new text begin (5) the issuance of personalized license plates not subject to a recall by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The following license plates are not eligible to be issued for an owner's lifetime: new text end new text begin (1) temporary license plates issued under section 168.091 or 168.092; new text end new text begin (2) dealer and drive-away in-transit license plates issued under sections 168.053 and 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17; new text end new text begin (3) plates for vehicles exempt from tax and fees or vehicles exempt from plate display under section 168.012; new text end new text begin (4) plates for vehicles available and taxed as short-term vehicle rentals under section 297A.64; new text end new text begin (5) plates for commercial fleet vehicles under section 168.127; new text end new text begin (6) plates issued to a vehicle used for behind-the-wheel instruction in a driver education course in a public school; or new text end new text begin (7) limousine plates issued under section 168.128. new text end new text begin (c) Plates issued under this section are not subject to the seven-year time period specified in section 168.12, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), clause (2). new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the lifetime license plates issued under this section are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed, the owner may apply for and be issued duplicate license plates bearing the same combination of letters and numbers and the same design as the former plates upon payment of the fee required under section 168.29. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Retention. new text end new text begin (a) A vehicle owner who has been issued standard, personalized, or specialty license plates under this chapter may retain the license plates as lifetime license plates. On payment of a fee of $20, plates issued under section 168.12, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), clause (2), may be placed under the vehicle owner's name, and the license plates must be removed from the vehicle and retained by the owner upon the sale, transfer, or disposal of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not assign the registration number on the lifetime license plates to a different owner unless the original owner has returned the license plates to the department. new text end new text begin (c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to the purchase of a new vehicle with a different registration classification under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Transfer. new text end new text begin (a) Upon the sale, trade-in, or other disposal of a motor vehicle, the owner must remove the lifetime license plates and retain them for use on a newly acquired vehicle. The owner must submit a request to transfer the plates to the new vehicle within 60 days of acquiring the new vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must establish a transfer process for plates issued under this section to reassign the plates to another vehicle. The transfer process established by the commissioner must ensure the retained plates are reassigned to the new vehicle and the vehicle owner's registration information is updated promptly. The process must ensure state and local law enforcement have access to updated registration information to verify the validity of transferred plates. new text end new text begin (c) On payment of a fee of $10, plates issued under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), may be transferred to another vehicle described in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), registered to the individual to whom the plates were issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Registration renewal; return of plates; impoundment not eligible. new text end new text begin (a) A person issued lifetime license plates under this section must continue to pay the annual registration renewal fees required under section 168.013. new text end new text begin (b) Lifetime license plates not renewed within 30 days of the vehicle registration's expiration date are subject to recall, suspension, and reissuance by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Except for the conditions of reissuance under section 169A.60, subdivision 8 or 11, a person subject to an impoundment order under section 169A.60 for lifetime license plates issued under this section forfeits the plates' unique combination of letters and numbers and may only apply to the commissioner for issuance of new lifetime license plates after the conclusion of the effective period of the impoundment order. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Display. new text end new text begin (a) Plates displayed under this subdivision, including stickers applied to the plates, must be clearly legible and must be displayed on the motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) Lifetime license plates assigned under this subdivision must bear a tab sticker to indicate the month and year of registration. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Penalty; unauthorized transfer. new text end new text begin A person who transfers or retains a license plate without authorization by the commissioner is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, for license plates issued on or after that date. new text end